Illinois, session 104th, HB711.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Water and Sewer Financial Assistance Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 21/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Water 8and Sewer Financial Assistance Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-262, eff. 8-6-21.)